Hawaii statutes.
[§346-398] Petition; venue. (a)
Within thirty days after the voluntary care agreement is signed, the department
shall file with the court in the county where the young adult resides a
petition invoking the jurisdiction of the court under this part, which shall
contain:

(1) The young adult's name, date of birth, and
current address;

(2) A statement of facts that supports the
eligibility of the young adult for foster care services that includes the
following:

(A) The reasonable efforts made to achieve
permanency for the young adult; and

(B) The reasons why it is in the best
interest of the young adult to extend foster care services; and

(3) A copy of the signed voluntary care agreement.

(b) Upon the filing of the petition, the court
shall open a young adult voluntary foster care case for the purpose of
determining whether extending foster care services is in the young adult's best
interests. The court shall conduct a hearing and make its determination no
later than fifteen days after the filing of the petition.

(c) The court shall set a periodic review to
be held within one hundred eighty days after the signing of the voluntary care
agreement. [L 2013, c 252, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next